test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-evi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - эви: # Noun 'girl'
     эви+N+Sg+Nom: эви
     эви+N+Sg+Lat: эвиа
     эви+N+Sg+Loc: эвиӑн
#
     эви+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: эвием
     эви+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat: эвиема
     эви+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc: эвиемӑн
#
     эви+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: эвиен
     эви+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat: эвиена
     эви+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc: эвиенӑн
#
     эви+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: эвилд
     эви+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat: эвилда
     эви+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc: эвилдӑн
#
     эви+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom: эвиемӑн
     эви+N+Sg+PxDu1+Lat: эвиемӑна
     эви+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc: эвиемӑнӑн
#
     эви+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom: эвиӑн
     эви+N+Sg+PxDu2+Lat: эвиӑна
     эви+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc: эвиӑнӑн
#
     эви+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom: эвиӑн
     эви+N+Sg+PxDu3+Lat: эвиӑна
     эви+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc: эвиӑнӑн
#
     эви+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: эвиев
     эви+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat: эвиева
     эви+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc: эвиевӑн
#
     эви+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: эвиӑн
     эви+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat: эвиӑна
     эви+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc: эвиӑнӑн
#
     эви+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: эвиӑлд
     эви+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat: эвиӑлда
     эви+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc: эвиӑлдӑн
#
     эви+N+Du+Nom: эвингӑн
     эви+N+Du+Lat: эвингӑна
     эви+N+Du+Loc: эвингӑнӑн
#
     эви+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom: эвингӑлдам
     эви+N+Du+PxSg1+Lat: эвингӑлдама
     эви+N+Du+PxSg1+Loc: эвингӑлдамӑн
#
     эви+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom: эвингӑлдан
     эви+N+Du+PxSg2+Lat: эвингӑлдана
     эви+N+Du+PxSg2+Loc: эвингӑлданӑн
#
     эви+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom: эвингӑлдалд
     эви+N+Du+PxSg3+Lat: эвингӑлдалда
     эви+N+Du+PxSg3+Loc: эвингӑлдалдӑн

#
     эви+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom: эвингӑлдӑмӑн
     эви+N+Du+PxDu1+Lat: эвингӑлдӑмӑна
     эви+N+Du+PxDu1+Loc: эвингӑлдӑмӑнӑн
#
     эви+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom: эвингӑлдӑн
     эви+N+Du+PxDu2+Lat: эвингӑлдӑна
     эви+N+Du+PxDu2+Loc: эвингӑлдӑнӑн
#
     эви+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom: эвингӑлдалд
     эви+N+Du+PxDu3+Lat: эвингӑлдалда
     эви+N+Du+PxDu3+Loc: эвингӑлдалдӑн
#
     эви+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom: эвингӑлдув
     эви+N+Du+PxPl1+Lat: эвингӑлдува
     эви+N+Du+PxPl1+Loc: эвингӑлдувӑн
#
     эви+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom: эвингӑлдӑн
     эви+N+Du+PxPl2+Lat: эвингӑлдӑна
     эви+N+Du+PxPl2+Loc: эвингӑлдӑнӑн
#
     эви+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom: эвингӑлдалд
     эви+N+Du+PxPl3+Lat: эвингӑлдалда
     эви+N+Du+PxPl3+Loc: эвингӑлдалдӑн
#
     эви+N+Pl+Nom: эвиӑт
     эви+N+Pl+Lat: эвиӑта
     эви+N+Pl+Loc: эвиӑтӑн

     эви+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: эвилдам
     эви+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat: эвилдама
     эви+N+Pl+PxSg1+Loc: эвилдамӑн

     эви+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: эвилдан
     эви+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat: эвилдана
     эви+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc: эвилданӑн

     эви+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: эвилдалд
     эви+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat: эвилдалда
     эви+N+Pl+PxSg3+Loc: эвилдалдӑн


     эви+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom: эвилдӑмӑн
     эви+N+Pl+PxDu1+Lat: эвилдӑмӑна
     эви+N+Pl+PxDu1+Loc: эвилдӑмӑнӑн

     эви+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom: эвилдӑн
     эви+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat: эвилдӑна
     эви+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc: эвилдӑнӑн

     эви+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom: эвилдалд
     эви+N+Pl+PxDu3+Lat: эвилдалда
     эви+N+Pl+PxDu3+Loc: эвилдалдӑн

     эви+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: эвилдув
     эви+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat: эвилдува
     эви+N+Pl+PxPl1+Loc: эвилдувӑн

     эви+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: эвилдӑн
     эви+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat: эвилдӑна
     эви+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc: эвилдӑнӑн

     эви+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: эвилдалд
     эви+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat: эвилдалда
     эви+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc: эвилдалдӑн
